Utah statutes.
53-6-303.   Completion of certification examination required -- Persons affected.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a person must successfully complete the basic dispatcher training course and pass the certification examination according to the requirements of this part before that person can be a certified dispatcher.

(2)  Subsection (1) applies only to persons not previously certified and who receive their first employment as a dispatcher in this state on or after July 1, 1996.



Enacted by Chapter 134, 1995 General Session

